Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2603
Possession of salvage vehicle on
August 26, 1983; effect.

Any wrecker or salvage dealer licensed
by the board pursuant to the
Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act having possession on August
26, 1983, of both a salvage vehicle and a certificate of title for such vehicle,
either issued to or assigned to such a person, shall not be required to obtain
a salvage branded certificate of title for such vehicle except upon transfer
of the vehicle to a person not required to be licensed as a wrecker or salvage
dealer by the board.

Laws 1983, LB 234, § 23;

Laws 2002, LB 830, § 24;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 87.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.